Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.240

Order—Effect.

If the court shall make the order provided for in RCW 6.13.210, the same shall be entered upon the minutes of the court, and thereafter any sale, conveyance, or mortgage made in pursuance of such order shall be as valid and effectual as if the property affected thereby was the absolute property of the person making such sale, conveyance, or mortgage in fee simple.

[ 1987 c 442 s 224; 1895 c 64 s 29; RRS s 557. Formerly RCW 6.12.330.]